Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201176-2423
Representation; commencement and
termination; when.

(1)(a) The relationships set forth in
sections 76-2401 to 76-2430 shall commence at the time that the licensee begins
representing a client and continue until performance or completion of the
representation.

(b) If the representation is not performed or completed for any reason,
the relationship shall end at the earlier of:

(i) The date of expiration agreed upon by the parties; or

(ii) The termination or relinquishment of the relationship by the parties.

(2) Except as otherwise agreed in writing, a licensee shall owe no further
duty or obligation after termination or expiration of the contract or representation
or completion of performance except the duties of:

(a) Accounting for all money and property related to and received during
the relationship; and

(b) Keeping confidential all information received during the course
of the relationship which was made confidential by sections 76-2401 to 76-2430,
by instructions from the client, or by the policy of the designated broker
unless:

(i) The client to whom the information pertains grants written consent
to disclose the information; or

(ii) Disclosure of the information is required by law.

Laws 1994, LB 883, § 23;

Laws 2011, LB25, § 11.
August 27, 2011